North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36C. North Carolina Uniform Trust Code.
Article 6. Revocable Trusts.

General Comment

This article deals with issues of significance not totally settled under prior law. Because of the widespread use in recent years of the revocable trust as an alternative to a will, this short article is one of the more important articles of the Code. This article and the other articles of the Code treat the revocable trust as the functional equivalent of a will. Section 601 provides that the capacity standard for wills applies in determining whether the settlor had capacity to create a revocable trust. Section 602, after providing that a trust is presumed revocable unless stated otherwise, prescribes the procedure for revocation or amendment, whether the trust contains one or several settlors. Section 603 provides that while a trust is revocable and the settlor has capacity, the rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the settlor’s control. Section 604 prescribes a statute of limitations on contest of revocable trusts.

Sections 601 and 604, because they address requirements relating to creation and contest of trusts, are not subject to alteration or restriction in the terms of the trust.
See
Section 105. Sections 602 and 603, by contrast, are not so limited and are fully subject to the settlor’s control.

§ 36C-6-601.
Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.

History.

2005-192, s. 2.

§ 36C-6-602.
Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust without regard to the actual capacity of the settlor. This subsection does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before the effective date of this Chapter.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one settlor:

To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses; and

To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor’s contribution.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

By oral statement to the trustee if the trust was created orally; or

Any other written method delivered to the trustee manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor’s intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 21, effective October 1, 2007.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-106, s. 22, effective October 1, 2007.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor’s successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2007-106, ss. 21, 22.

§ 36C-6-602.1.
Exercise of settlor’s powers with respect to revocable trust by agent or guardian.

An agent acting under a power of attorney may exercise any of the following powers of the settlor with respect to a revocable trust only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power of attorney:

Revocation of the trust.

Amendment of the trust.

Additions to the trust.

Direction to dispose of property of the trust.

The creation of the trust, notwithstanding G.S. 36C-4-402(a)(1) and (2).The exercise of the powers described in this subsection shall not alter the designation of beneficiaries to receive property on the settlor’s death under that settlor’s existing estate plan.

A general guardian or a guardian of the estate of the settlor may exercise the powers of the settlor with respect to a revocable trust as provided in G.S. 35A-1251(24).

History.

2007-106, s. 23.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

Effective October 1, 2007, subsection (a) brings forward in substance the provisions of former

G.S. 36C-6-602(e)

authorizing the settlor’s agent under a power of attorney to revoke or amend a revocable trust and distribute trust property. It adds provisions, not a part of the Uniform Trust Code, authorizing an agent to make additions to a revocable trust and to create a revocable trust. Subsection (a) retains, and makes applicable to the power to make additions to a revocable trust and to create a revocable trust, the provisions in former

G.S. 36C-6-602(e)

prohibiting the agent from exercising the powers described in that section in a manner that alters the designation of beneficiaries to receive property on the settlor’s death under the settlor’s existing estate plan. The terms of the trust or power of attorney cannot override this restriction on the agent’s powers.
See G.S. 36C-1-105(b)(11) (trust) and G.S. 32A-3(c) (power of attorney).

Subsection (b), also effective October 1, 2007, acknowledges that a general guardian or guardian of the estate may exercise the settlor’s powers with respect to a revocable trust as provided in G.S. 35A-1251(24). That section was amended effective October 1, 2007 to bring forward the provisions of former

G.S. 36C-6-602

(f) and authorize a general guardian or guardian of the estate to exercise upon approval by the court the same powers of the settlor with respect to a revocable trust that an agent may exercise pursuant to

G.S. 36C-6-602

.1(a), subject to provisions of statutes governing gifts by guardians.

§ 36C-6-603.
Settlor’s control of revocable trust.

While a trust is revocable, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor. If a trustee is a settlor, the trustee’s actions are presumed to be taken at the direction of the settlor.

If a revocable trust has more than one settlor, the duties of the trustee are owed to all of the settlors.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2007-106, s. 24.

§ 36C-6-604.
Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust; distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death within the earlier of:

Three years after the settlor’s death; or

120 days after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and written notice pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4 of the Rules of Civil Procedure, informing the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is not subject to liability for doing so unless:

The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust, and a judicial proceeding is commenced within 60 days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been invalid is liable to return any distribution received.

History.

2005-192, s. 2; 2011-344, s. 13; 2012-18, s. 3.11.

§ 36C-6-605.
Failure of disposition of property of a trust by lapse or otherwise.

If a beneficiary under a revocable trust predeceases the execution of the trust or the settlor or is treated as having predeceased the settlor, and if the beneficiary is a grandparent of or a descendant of a grandparent of the settlor, then the issue of the predeceased beneficiary who survive the settlor shall take in place of the deceased beneficiary. The deceased beneficiary’s issue shall take the deceased beneficiary’s share in the same manner that the issue would take as heirs of the deceased beneficiary under the intestacy provisions in effect at the time of the settlor’s death. The provisions of this section apply whether the disposition of property is to an individual, to a class, or is a part of the residue of the trust. In the case of the disposition to a class, the issue shall take whatever share the deceased beneficiary would have taken had the deceased beneficiary survived the settlor. In the event the deceased class member leaves no issue, the deceased beneficiary’s share shall devolve upon the members of the class who survived the settlor and the issue of any deceased members taking by substitution.

If the provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to the disposition of property that fails, the property shall pass to the beneficiaries in proportion to their share of the residue of the trust. If the disposition is part of the residue of the trust, it shall augment the shares of the other residuary beneficiaries, including the shares of any substitute takers under subsection (a) of this section. If there are no residuary beneficiaries, then the property shall pass by intestacy.

History.

2007-106, s. 25.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

Effective October 1, 2007, this section, which is not a part of the Uniform Trust Code, provides anti-lapse rules governing the manner in which the share of a beneficiary of a revocable trust would be distributed if the beneficiary predeceases the settlor.
The section tracks generally and makes applicable to revocable trusts the anti-lapse provisions of

G.S. 31-42

applicable to wills.
It does not bring forward the language in

G.S. 31-42

that its anti-lapse rules do not apply if a contrary intent is expressed in the instrument. This language was omitted in view of the general provision in G.S. 36C-1-105(b) that the terms of the trust prevail over any provision in Chapter 36C, subject to certain exceptions not applicable to

G.S. 36C-6-605

.

§ 36C-6-606.
Revocation of provisions in revocable trust by divorce or annulment; revival.

Dissolution of the settlor’s marriage by absolute divorce or annulment after executing a revocable trust revokes all provisions in the trust in favor of the settlor’s former spouse, including, but not by way of limitation, any provision conferring a general or special power of appointment on the former spouse and any appointment of the former spouse as trustee. Property prevented from passing to the former spouse because of revocation by divorce or absolute annulment passes as if the former spouse failed to survive the settlor, and other provisions conferring some power or office on the former spouse are interpreted as if the former spouse failed to survive the settlor. If provisions are revoked solely by this section, they are revived by the settlor’s remarriage to the former spouse. The reference to “former spouse” in this section includes a purported former spouse.

History.

2007-106, s. 26.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

Effective October 1, 2007, this section, which provides for the revocation of provisions in a revocable trust in favor of the settlor’s former spouse upon the dissolution of the settlor’s marriage by absolute divorce or annulment, is not a part of the Uniform Trust Code. The section tracks generally and makes applicable to revocable trusts the provisions of

G.S. 31-5.4

revoking the provisions in a will in favor of the testator’s former spouse upon the dissolution of the marriage by absolute divorce or annulment.
It does not bring forward the language in

G.S. 31-5.4

that the revocation of the provisions in favor of the former spouse does not apply if the instrument provides otherwise. This language was omitted in view of the general provision in G.S. 36C-1-105(b) that the terms of the trust prevail over any provision in Chapter 36C, subject to certain exceptions not applicable to

G.S. 36C-6-606

.

§ 36C-6-607.
Modification or termination of a revocable trust.

A revocable trust may be modified or terminated by the court pursuant to any of the methods for modification or termination of an irrevocable trust set forth in

G.S. 36C-4-411(b)

or (c), 36C-4-412, 36C-4-415, or 36C-4-416.

The settlor is a necessary party to any proceeding brought to modify or terminate a revocable trust.

History.

2007-106, s. 26.1.

North Carolina Comment (2007)

Effective October 1, 2007, this section, which is not a part of the Uniform Trust Code, provides that a revocable trust may be modified or terminated by court order pursuant to any of the methods set forth in Article 4 of Chapter 36C for modifying or terminating an irrevocable trust.
There is no requirement that the settlor of the revocable trust must first be adjudicated or otherwise determined to be incompetent before a proceeding under this section may be maintained.
The section also makes clear that the settlor is a necessary party to any proceeding brought under the section.